North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 6. Special Provisions.
§ 122C-453.
Technical assistance and monitoring.

The State Board of Education and the Department of Public Instruction shall (i) offer training to PRTFs on compliance with special education laws and regulations, (ii) maintain a current list of names of children residing in PRTFs along with the name and contact information of the PRTF in which each child resides, and (iii) develop and implement rules to monitor the delivery of educational services in PRTFs, including a process to inform the Department of Health and Human Services when services are not being provided. The Department of Health and Human Services shall appropriately enforce applicable licensing requirements as provided under

G.S. 122C-23.1

.

History.

2014-100, s. 8.39(e).

§ 122C-454.
Reporting requirement.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Public Instruction, in collaboration with other interested agencies, shall submit, by January 15 of each year, a joint report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the delivery of educational services in PRTFs, including (i) the annual number of children by age residing in a PRTF both with and without an Individualized Education Program, (ii) the average length of stay of these children, (iii) the types of educational services, including number of hours each type of service has been provided, (iv) the costs and outcomes of providing educational services, and (v) recommendations for improving the efficiency and effectiveness of delivering educational services to children residing in PRTFs.

History.

2014-100, s. 8.39(e).

§§ 122C-455 through 122C-464.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Traumatic Brain Injury And Posttraumatic Stress Disorder Services for Veterans.

§ 122C-465.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:

Authorized medical professional. — A doctor of medicine, nurse practitioner, physician assistant, or doctor of osteopathy licensed to practice in this State.

Hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment. — Treatment with a valid prescription from an authorized medical professional in either a hyperbaric chamber approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA), or a device with an appropriate FDA-approved investigational device exemption.

Veteran. — A person who served on active duty, other than for training, in any component of the Armed Forces of the United States for a period of 180 days or more, unless released earlier because of service-connected disability, and who was discharged or released from the Armed Forces of the United States under other than dishonorable conditions.

History.

2019-175, s. 2(b).

§ 122C-466.
Hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment authorized.

No person other than an authorized medical professional shall prescribe hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment to a veteran for the treatment of traumatic brain injury or posttraumatic stress disorder. Any authorized medical professional who prescribes hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment to a veteran for traumatic brain injury or posttraumatic stress disorder shall do so in a manner that complies with the standard approved treatment protocols for this therapy.

Any veteran residing in North Carolina who has been diagnosed with a traumatic brain injury or posttraumatic stress disorder by an authorized medical professional may receive hyperbaric oxygen therapy treatment in this State.

History.

2019-175, s. 2(b).

§ 122C-999.

Table of Comparable Sections for
Chapters 122 and 122C Prepared
by Legislative Services Office

tablenum=“=table24” align=“left”> =c1 122-23.3
. . . . .
122C-22 =c1 122-23.4
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-23.5
. . . . .
122C-24 =c1 122-23.6
. . . . .
122C-25 =c1 122-23.7
. . . . .
122C-26 =c1 122-23.8
. . . . .
122C-27 =c1 122-23.9
. . . . .
122C-28 =c1 122-23.10
. . . . .
122C-29 =c1 122-24
. . . . .
122C-210.1 =c1 122-24.1
. . . . .
122C-122 =c1 122-27
. . . . .
122C-205 =c1 122-28
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-31
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-33
. . . . .
122C-183 =c1 122-34
. . . . .
122C-184 =c1 122-35
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.13
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.14
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.15
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.16
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.17
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.24
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.25
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.26
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.27
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.35
. . . . .
122C-2 =c2 122C-101 =c2 122C-117 =c2 122C-118 =c2 122C-132 =c2 122C-191 =c1 122-35.36
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-112 =c2 122C-116 =c2 122C-132 =c1 122-35.37
. . . . .
122C-112 =c2 122C-117 =c1 122-35.38
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-35.39
. . . . .
122C-115 =c2 122C-118 =c1 122-35.40
. . . . .
122C-118 =c2 122C-119 =c1 122-35.40A
. . . . .
122C-120 =c1 122-35.40B
. . . . .
122C-152 =c1 122-35.40C
. . . . .
122C-153 =c1 122-35.40D
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.41
. . . . .
122C-141 =c2 122C-145 =c1 122-35.42
. . . . .
122C-115 =c1 122-35.43
. . . . .
122C-132 =c2 122C-143 =c1 122-35.44
. . . . .
122C-144 =c1 122-35.45
. . . . .
122C-117 =c2 122C-121 =c2 122C-154 =c2 122C-155 =c1 122-35.45A
. . . . .
122C-158 =c1 122-35.46
. . . . .
122C-156 =c1 122-35.47
. . . . .
122C-146 =c1 122-35.48
. . . . .
122C-157 =c1 122-35.49
. . . . .
122C-141 =c2 122C-142 =c1 122-35.50
. . . . .
122C-145 =c1 122-35.51
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.52
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.53
. . . . .
122C-147 =c1 122-35.54
. . . . .
122C-148 =c1 122-35.55
. . . . .
122C-149 =c1 122-35.56
. . . . .
122C-150 =c1 122-35.57
. . . . .
122C-151 =c1 122-36
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-37
. . . . .
122C-341 =c2 122C-348 =c1 122-38
. . . . .
122C-342 =c2 122C-343 =c2 122C-345 =c1 122-39
. . . . .
122C-345 =c2 122C-346 =c2 122C-348 =c1 122-40
. . . . .
122C-347 =c1 122-40.1
. . . . .
122C-344 =c1 122-41
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-42
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-43
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-48
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-49
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-50
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-51
. . . . .
122C-204 =c1 122-53
. . . . .
122C-186 =c1 122-54
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-55
. . . . .
122C-203 =c1 122-55.1
. . . . .
122C-51 =c1 122-55.2
. . . . .
122C-53 =c2 122C-58 =c2 122C-62 =c1 122-55.3
. . . . .
122C-60 =c1 122-55.4
. . . . .
122C-59 =c1 122-55.5
. . . . .
122C-51 =c1 122-55.6
. . . . .
122C-57 =c2 122C-61 =c2 122C-206 =c1 122-55.7
. . . . .
122C-58 =c1 122-55.8
. . . . .
122C-63 =c1 122-55.13
. . . . .
122C-51 =c2 122C-62 =c1 122-55.14
. . . . .
122C-62 =c1 122-56.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-56.2
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-56.3
. . . . .
122C-211 =c2 122C-212 =c1 122-56.4
. . . . .
122C-321 =c1 122-56.5
. . . . .
122C-221 =c2 122C-222 =c2 122C-231 =c1 122-56.6
. . . . .
122C-208 =c1 122-56.7
. . . . .
122C-223 =c2 122C-224 =c2 122C-232 =c2 122C-233 =c1 122-56.8
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-56.9
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-56.10
. . . . .
122C-312 =c1 122-58.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-58.2
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-58.3
. . . . .
122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-58.4
. . . . .
122C-252 =c2 122C-263 =c2 122C-283 =c1 122-58.5
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.6
. . . . .
122C-266 =c2 122C-285 =c1 122-58.6A
. . . . .
122C-265 =c1 122-58.7
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.7A
. . . . .
122C-269 =c1 122-58.7A:1
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.8
. . . . .
122C-253 =c2 122C-271 =c2 122C-287 =c1 122-58.8A
. . . . .
122C-210.1 =c1 122-58.9
. . . . .
122C-272 =c2 122C-288 =c1 122-58.10
. . . . .
122C-270 =c2 122C-289 =c1 122-58.10A
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-273 =c2 122C-290 =c1 122-58.10B
. . . . .
122C-274 =c1 122-58.11
. . . . .
122C-276 =c2 122C-292 =c1 122-58.11A
. . . . .
122C-275 =c1 122-58.12
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.13
. . . . .
122C-277 =c2 122C-293 =c1 122-58.14
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-58.15
. . . . .
122C-332 =c1 122-58.16
. . . . .
122C-143 =c2 122C-294 =c1 122-58.17
. . . . .
Sec. 63(e) =c2 (Uncod.) =c1 122-58.18
. . . . .
122C-262 =c2 122C-282 =c1 122-58.19
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.20
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.21
. . . . .
122C-322 =c1 122-58.22
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.23
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.24
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.25
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-58.26
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-58.27
. . . . .
122C-254 =c1 122-65.10
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-65.11
. . . . .
122C-301 =c1 122-65.12
. . . . .
122C-302 =c1 122-65.13
. . . . .
122C-303 =c1 122-69
. . . . .
122C-112 =c2 122C-181 =c1 122-69.1
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-70
. . . . .
122C-241 =c1 122-71
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.1
. . . . .
122C-242 =c1 122-71.2
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-71.3
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.4
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.5
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.6
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-72
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-72.1
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-73
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-74
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81.1
. . . . .
122C-211 =c1 122-81.2
. . . . .
122C-207 =c2 122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-82
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-85
. . . . .
122C-313 =c1 122-85.1
. . . . .
122C-311 =c1 122-92
. . . . .
122C-401 =c1 122-93
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-94
. . . . .
122C-402 =c1 122-95
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-403 =c1 122-96
. . . . .
122C-405 =c1 122-97
. . . . .
122C-406 =c1 122-98
. . . . .
122C-408 =c1 122-98.1
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.2
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.3
. . . . .
122C-421 =c1 122-99
. . . . .
122C-361 =c1 122-100
. . . . .
122C-362 =c1 122-101
. . . . .
122C-363 =c1 122-102
. . . . .
122C-364 =c1 122-103
. . . . .
122C-365 =c1 122-104
. . . . .
122C-366 =c1 122-109
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-120
. . . . .
122C-431 =c1 122-121
. . . . .
122C-432 =c1 122-122
. . . . .
122C-433 =te =c1 122-35.42
. . . . .
122C-115 =c1 122-35.43
. . . . .
122C-132 =c2 122C-143 =c1 122-35.44
. . . . .
122C-144 =c1 122-35.45
. . . . .
122C-117 =c2 122C-121 =c2 122C-154 =c2 122C-155 =c1 122-35.45A
. . . . .
122C-158 =c1 122-35.46
. . . . .
122C-156 =c1 122-35.47
. . . . .
122C-146 =c1 122-35.48
. . . . .
122C-157 =c1 122-35.49
. . . . .
122C-141 =c2 122C-142 =c1 122-35.50
. . . . .
122C-145 =c1 122-35.51
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.52
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-35.53
. . . . .
122C-147 =c1 122-35.54
. . . . .
122C-148 =c1 122-35.55
. . . . .
122C-149 =c1 122-35.56
. . . . .
122C-150 =c1 122-35.57
. . . . .
122C-151 =c1 122-36
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-37
. . . . .
122C-341 =c2 122C-348 =c1 122-38
. . . . .
122C-342 =c2 122C-343 =c2 122C-345 =c1 122-39
. . . . .
122C-345 =c2 122C-346 =c2 122C-348 =c1 122-40
. . . . .
122C-347 =c1 122-40.1
. . . . .
122C-344 =c1 122-41
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-42
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-43
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-48
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-49
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-50
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-51
. . . . .
122C-204 =c1 122-53
. . . . .
122C-186 =c1 122-54
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-55
. . . . .
122C-203 =c1 122-55.1
. . . . .
122C-51 =c1 122-55.2
. . . . .
122C-53 =c2 122C-58 =c2 122C-62 =c1 122-55.3
. . . . .
122C-60 =c1 122-55.4
. . . . .
122C-59 =c1 122-55.5
. . . . .
122C-51 =c1 122-55.6
. . . . .
122C-57 =c2 122C-61 =c2 122C-206 =c1 122-55.7
. . . . .
122C-58 =c1 122-55.8
. . . . .
122C-63 =c1 122-55.13
. . . . .
122C-51 =c2 122C-62 =c1 122-55.14
. . . . .
122C-62 =c1 122-56.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-56.2
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-56.3
. . . . .
122C-211 =c2 122C-212 =c1 122-56.4
. . . . .
122C-321 =c1 122-56.5
. . . . .
122C-221 =c2 122C-222 =c2 122C-231 =c1 122-56.6
. . . . .
122C-208 =c1 122-56.7
. . . . .
122C-223 =c2 122C-224 =c2 122C-232 =c2 122C-233 =c1 122-56.8
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-56.9
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-56.10
. . . . .
122C-312 =c1 122-58.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-58.2
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-58.3
. . . . .
122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-58.4
. . . . .
122C-252 =c2 122C-263 =c2 122C-283 =c1 122-58.5
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.6
. . . . .
122C-266 =c2 122C-285 =c1 122-58.6A
. . . . .
122C-265 =c1 122-58.7
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.7A
. . . . .
122C-269 =c1 122-58.7A:1
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.8
. . . . .
122C-253 =c2 122C-271 =c2 122C-287 =c1 122-58.8A
. . . . .
122C-210.1 =c1 122-58.9
. . . . .
122C-272 =c2 122C-288 =c1 122-58.10
. . . . .
122C-270 =c2 122C-289 =c1 122-58.10A
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-273 =c2 122C-290 =c1 122-58.10B
. . . . .
122C-274 =c1 122-58.11
. . . . .
122C-276 =c2 122C-292 =c1 122-58.11A
. . . . .
122C-275 =c1 122-58.12
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.13
. . . . .
122C-277 =c2 122C-293 =c1 122-58.14
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-58.15
. . . . .
122C-332 =c1 122-58.16
. . . . .
122C-143 =c2 122C-294 =c1 122-58.17
. . . . .
Sec. 63(e) =c2 (Uncod.) =c1 122-58.18
. . . . .
122C-262 =c2 122C-282 =c1 122-58.19
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.20
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.21
. . . . .
122C-322 =c1 122-58.22
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.23
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.24
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.25
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-58.26
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-58.27
. . . . .
122C-254 =c1 122-65.10
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-65.11
. . . . .
122C-301 =c1 122-65.12
. . . . .
122C-302 =c1 122-65.13
. . . . .
122C-303 =c1 122-69
. . . . .
122C-112 =c2 122C-181 =c1 122-69.1
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-70
. . . . .
122C-241 =c1 122-71
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.1
. . . . .
122C-242 =c1 122-71.2
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-71.3
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.4
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.5
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.6
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-72
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-72.1
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-73
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-74
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81.1
. . . . .
122C-211 =c1 122-81.2
. . . . .
122C-207 =c2 122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-82
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-85
. . . . .
122C-313 =c1 122-85.1
. . . . .
122C-311 =c1 122-92
. . . . .
122C-401 =c1 122-93
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-94
. . . . .
122C-402 =c1 122-95
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-403 =c1 122-96
. . . . .
122C-405 =c1 122-97
. . . . .
122C-406 =c1 122-98
. . . . .
122C-408 =c1 122-98.1
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.2
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.3
. . . . .
122C-421 =c1 122-99
. . . . .
122C-361 =c1 122-100
. . . . .
122C-362 =c1 122-101
. . . . .
122C-363 =c1 122-102
. . . . .
122C-364 =c1 122-103
. . . . .
122C-365 =c1 122-104
. . . . .
122C-366 =c1 122-109
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-120
. . . . .
122C-431 =c1 122-121
. . . . .
122C-432 =c1 122-122
. . . . .
122C-433 =te =c1 122-55.3
. . . . .
122C-60 =c1 122-55.4
. . . . .
122C-59 =c1 122-55.5
. . . . .
122C-51 =c1 122-55.6
. . . . .
122C-57 =c2 122C-61 =c2 122C-206 =c1 122-55.7
. . . . .
122C-58 =c1 122-55.8
. . . . .
122C-63 =c1 122-55.13
. . . . .
122C-51 =c2 122C-62 =c1 122-55.14
. . . . .
122C-62 =c1 122-56.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-56.2
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-56.3
. . . . .
122C-211 =c2 122C-212 =c1 122-56.4
. . . . .
122C-321 =c1 122-56.5
. . . . .
122C-221 =c2 122C-222 =c2 122C-231 =c1 122-56.6
. . . . .
122C-208 =c1 122-56.7
. . . . .
122C-223 =c2 122C-224 =c2 122C-232 =c2 122C-233 =c1 122-56.8
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-56.9
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-56.10
. . . . .
122C-312 =c1 122-58.1
. . . . .
122C-201 =c1 122-58.2
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-58.3
. . . . .
122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-58.4
. . . . .
122C-252 =c2 122C-263 =c2 122C-283 =c1 122-58.5
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.6
. . . . .
122C-266 =c2 122C-285 =c1 122-58.6A
. . . . .
122C-265 =c1 122-58.7
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.7A
. . . . .
122C-269 =c1 122-58.7A:1
. . . . .
122C-267 =c1 122-58.8
. . . . .
122C-253 =c2 122C-271 =c2 122C-287 =c1 122-58.8A
. . . . .
122C-210.1 =c1 122-58.9
. . . . .
122C-272 =c2 122C-288 =c1 122-58.10
. . . . .
122C-270 =c2 122C-289 =c1 122-58.10A
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-273 =c2 122C-290 =c1 122-58.10B
. . . . .
122C-274 =c1 122-58.11
. . . . .
122C-276 =c2 122C-292 =c1 122-58.11A
. . . . .
122C-275 =c1 122-58.12
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.13
. . . . .
122C-277 =c2 122C-293 =c1 122-58.14
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-58.15
. . . . .
122C-332 =c1 122-58.16
. . . . .
122C-143 =c2 122C-294 =c1 122-58.17
. . . . .
Sec. 63(e) =c2 (Uncod.) =c1 122-58.18
. . . . .
122C-262 =c2 122C-282 =c1 122-58.19
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.20
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.21
. . . . .
122C-322 =c1 122-58.22
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.23
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.24
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.25
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-58.26
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-58.27
. . . . .
122C-254 =c1 122-65.10
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-65.11
. . . . .
122C-301 =c1 122-65.12
. . . . .
122C-302 =c1 122-65.13
. . . . .
122C-303 =c1 122-69
. . . . .
122C-112 =c2 122C-181 =c1 122-69.1
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-70
. . . . .
122C-241 =c1 122-71
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.1
. . . . .
122C-242 =c1 122-71.2
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-71.3
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.4
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.5
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.6
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-72
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-72.1
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-73
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-74
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81.1
. . . . .
122C-211 =c1 122-81.2
. . . . .
122C-207 =c2 122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-82
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-85
. . . . .
122C-313 =c1 122-85.1
. . . . .
122C-311 =c1 122-92
. . . . .
122C-401 =c1 122-93
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-94
. . . . .
122C-402 =c1 122-95
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-403 =c1 122-96
. . . . .
122C-405 =c1 122-97
. . . . .
122C-406 =c1 122-98
. . . . .
122C-408 =c1 122-98.1
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.2
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.3
. . . . .
122C-421 =c1 122-99
. . . . .
122C-361 =c1 122-100
. . . . .
122C-362 =c1 122-101
. . . . .
122C-363 =c1 122-102
. . . . .
122C-364 =c1 122-103
. . . . .
122C-365 =c1 122-104
. . . . .
122C-366 =c1 122-109
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-120
. . . . .
122C-431 =c1 122-121
. . . . .
122C-432 =c1 122-122
. . . . .
122C-433 =te =c1 122-58.11A
. . . . .
122C-275 =c1 122-58.12
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.13
. . . . .
122C-277 =c2 122C-293 =c1 122-58.14
. . . . .
122C-251 =c1 122-58.15
. . . . .
122C-332 =c1 122-58.16
. . . . .
122C-143 =c2 122C-294 =c1 122-58.17
. . . . .
Sec. 63(e) =c2 (Uncod.) =c1 122-58.18
. . . . .
122C-262 =c2 122C-282 =c1 122-58.19
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.20
. . . . .
122C-264 =c2 122C-284 =c1 122-58.21
. . . . .
122C-322 =c1 122-58.22
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.23
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-58.24
. . . . .
122C-270 =c1 122-58.25
. . . . .
122C-54 =c2 122C-207 =c1 122-58.26
. . . . .
122C-54 =c1 122-58.27
. . . . .
122C-254 =c1 122-65.10
. . . . .
122C-3 =c1 122-65.11
. . . . .
122C-301 =c1 122-65.12
. . . . .
122C-302 =c1 122-65.13
. . . . .
122C-303 =c1 122-69
. . . . .
122C-112 =c2 122C-181 =c1 122-69.1
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-70
. . . . .
122C-241 =c1 122-71
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.1
. . . . .
122C-242 =c1 122-71.2
. . . . .
122C-65 =c1 122-71.3
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.4
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.5
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-71.6
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-72
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-72.1
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-73
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-74
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81.1
. . . . .
122C-211 =c1 122-81.2
. . . . .
122C-207 =c2 122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-82
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-85
. . . . .
122C-313 =c1 122-85.1
. . . . .
122C-311 =c1 122-92
. . . . .
122C-401 =c1 122-93
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-94
. . . . .
122C-402 =c1 122-95
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-403 =c1 122-96
. . . . .
122C-405 =c1 122-97
. . . . .
122C-406 =c1 122-98
. . . . .
122C-408 =c1 122-98.1
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.2
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.3
. . . . .
122C-421 =c1 122-99
. . . . .
122C-361 =c1 122-100
. . . . .
122C-362 =c1 122-101
. . . . .
122C-363 =c1 122-102
. . . . .
122C-364 =c1 122-103
. . . . .
122C-365 =c1 122-104
. . . . .
122C-366 =c1 122-109
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-120
. . . . .
122C-431 =c1 122-121
. . . . .
122C-432 =c1 122-122
. . . . .
122C-433 =te =c1 122-72
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-72.1
. . . . .
122C-23 =c1 122-73
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-74
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-81.1
. . . . .
122C-211 =c1 122-81.2
. . . . .
122C-207 =c2 122C-261 =c2 122C-281 =c1 122-82
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-85
. . . . .
122C-313 =c1 122-85.1
. . . . .
122C-311 =c1 122-92
. . . . .
122C-401 =c1 122-93
. . . . .
Repealed =c1 122-94
. . . . .
122C-402 =c1 122-95
. . . . .
122C-3 =c2 122C-403 =c1 122-96
. . . . .
122C-405 =c1 122-97
. . . . .
122C-406 =c1 122-98
. . . . .
122C-408 =c1 122-98.1
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.2
. . . . .
122C-181 =c1 122-98.3
. . . . .
122C-421 =c1 122-99
. . . . .
122C-361 =c1 122-100
. . . . .
122C-362 =c1 122-101
. . . . .
122C-363 =c1 122-102
. . . . .
122C-364 =c1 122-103
. . . . .
122C-365 =c1 122-104
. . . . .
122C-366 =c1 122-109
. . . . .
122C-112 =c1 122-120
. . . . .
122C-431 =c1 122-121
. . . . .
122C-432 =c1 122-122
. . . . .
122C-433 =te